Florida, session 2026, SB210.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 16 119.0714, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 17 119.0714âCourt files; court records; official records.â 18 (1)âCOURT FILES.âNothing in this chapter shall be construed 19 to exempt from s. 119.07(1) a public record that was made a part 20 of a court file and that is not specifically closed by order of 21 court, except: 22 (k)1.âA petition, and the contents thereof, for an 23 injunction for protection against domestic violence, repeat 24 violence, dating violence, sexual violence, serious violence by 25 a known person, stalking, or cyberstalking which that is 26 dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex parte hearing 27 due to failure to state a claim or lack of jurisdiction, or 28 dismissed for any reason having to do with the sufficiency of 29 the petition itself without an injunction being issued on or 30 after July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 31 Art. I of the State Constitution. 32 2.âA petition, and the contents thereof, for an injunction 33 for protection against domestic violence, repeat violence, 34 dating violence, sexual violence, stalking, or cyberstalking 35 which that is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex 36 parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of 37 jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the 38 sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being 39 issued before July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 40 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution only upon request by an 41 individual named in the petition as a respondent. The request 42 must be in the form of a signed, legibly written request 43 specifying the case name, case number, document heading, and 44 page number. The request must be delivered by mail, facsimile, 45 or electronic transmission or in person to the clerk of the 46 court. A fee may not be charged for such request. 47 3.âAny information that can be used to identify a 48 petitioner or respondent in a petition for an injunction against 49 domestic violence, repeat violence, dating violence, sexual 50 violence, serious violence by a known person, stalking, or 51 cyberstalking, and any affidavits, notice of hearing, and 52 temporary injunction, is confidential and exempt from s. 53 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until 54 the respondent has been personally served with a copy of the 55 petition for injunction, affidavits, notice of hearing, and 56 temporary injunction. 57 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 58 necessity that a petition, and the contents thereof, for an 59 injunction for protection against serious violence by a known 60 person which is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex 61 parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of 62 jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the 63 sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being 64 issued be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 65 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The Legislature 66 finds that the existence of, and the unverified allegations 67 contained in, such a petition may be defamatory to an individual 68 named in it and cause unwarranted damage to the reputation of 69 such individual. The Legislature further finds that removing 70 such a record from public disclosure is the sole means of 71 protecting the reputation of such an individual. 72 (2)âAdditionally, the Legislature finds that it is a public 73 necessity that any information that can be used to identify a 74 petitioner or respondent in a petition for an injunction against 75 serious violence by a known person, and any affidavits, notice 76 of hearing, and temporary injunction, be made confidential and 77 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 78 Article I of the State Constitution. The release of such 79 information before the respondent has been personally served 80 with a copy of the petition, affidavits, notice of hearing, or 81 temporary injunction could significantly threaten the physical 82 safety and security of persons seeking protection through 83 injunctive proceedings and their families, and of law 84 enforcement tasked with serving the petition for injunction, 85 affidavits, notice of hearing, or temporary injunction on the 86 respondent. The harm that may result from the release of the 87 information outweighs any public benefit that might result from 88 public disclosure of the information. 89 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 90 SB 32 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 91 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 92 thereof and becomes a law.